Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1737
Income withholding; when effective.

If the obligor does not request a hearing in the time provided or if the foreign support order provides for income withholding regardless of whether or not payment pursuant to such order is in arrears, the income withholding notice shall take effect and the obligor's employer or other payor shall be notified pursuant to section 43-1723. If a hearing is held and it is determined that the obligee has been or is entitled to income withholding under the local law of the jurisdiction which issued the foreign support order, the court shall issue an income withholding order to the obligor's employer or other payor in the same manner as the notice provided for in section 43-1723.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 57;

Laws 1986, LB 600, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 457, § 41;

Laws 1993, LB 523, § 23.